Tennessee, session 114, HB1118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-9-402(d)(1), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(H) A motor vehicle operated by an emergency communications district that is
marked as a mobile command vehicle or mobile communications vehicle may display
flashing red or white lights or a combination of flashing red and white lights.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1118
003303
- 1 -